South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4002.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Greater Greenville Sanitation District are dissolved. (B) The chairmen of the commission shall ensure that all documents necessary to dissolve the commission are executed as required by this act. (C) The commission shall cease waste collections of any type on December 31, 2025. SECTION 2.  In preparation for the closure of the Greater Greenville Sanitation District, the commission shall: (A) mail three separate notices by United States Postal Service to all property owners informing the owner of the need to select a new private waste provider. The notice must: (1) be approved in advance by the Chairman of the Greenville Legislative Delegation; (2) include a list of any private providers desiring to be listed on the notice along with the phone number and website for the provider; (3) include a draft county property tax bill clearly showing where the existing millage and sanitation fees will be removed on future tax notices; and (4) be mailed on or about August 1, 2025, October 15, 2025, and December 1, 2025. (B) provide two job fair opportunities for all commission employees to be interviewed by private waste providers on or about August 1, 2025, and September 15, 2025; (C) sell all real and personal property on widely accepted government surplus websites between January 15, 2026, and May 15, 2026; (D) prepare an orderly and itemized accounting of all books and records, including but not limited to, general ledgers, checkbooks, and financial records of any type through May 31, 2026, and deliver the books and records in person to the Greenville County Administrator for safekeeping before June 30, 2026; (E) provide immediate notice to any affected party that the Greenville County Sanitation District is ordered to cease waste collections on or before December 31, 2025; (F) all bonds and debts of any type must be satisfied in full; (G) remit any and all remaining funds whether in cash or securities of any type to the Greenville County Treasurer with notice to the Greenville County Administrator for disbursement by ordinance of the Greenville County Council in its discretion. SECTION 3.  Act 1543 of 1968, as amended, is repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----